Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Grain Insurance

251.600.
Purpose. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.610.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 81, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 321, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 396, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 125, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 214, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.620.
Kentucky Grain Insurance Corporation — Board of directors — Powers. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 81, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 422, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 396, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 68, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.630.
Applicability. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.640.
Assessment of producers of fund-covered grains — Deduction of assessment — Assessments dependent upon balance in fund.

It is declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the Commonwealth that producers of fund-covered grains delivered to licensed grain dealers and licensed grain warehouse operators shall be assessed at a rate of .0025 times the gross value of the fund-covered grain. The board or the department shall provide for the collection of the assessment, under the provisions of this section, for the purpose of financing the Kentucky grain insurance fund, which is hereby created. Assessments shall be levied only on fund-covered grains.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, beginning on or after August 1, 2019, all persons in this state who are licensed grain dealers or licensed grain warehouse operators shall deduct the levied assessment from each producer’s payment for fund-covered grain. The total assessment collected by each licensee shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the month in which the grains are sold to the purchaser, be remitted to the grain insurance fund. The books and records shall clearly indicate the producer assessment and shall be open for inspection by the board or the department. The board or the department may take steps as are reasonably necessary to verify the accuracy of books and records of purchasers of grain.

Beginning on August 1, 2019, no assessment shall be collected if the board has certified that the fund is greater than three million dollars ($3,000,000). If the board receives notification the fund is less than three million dollars ($3,000,000), then the board shall within sixty (60) days reinstate the assessment fee of .0025 times the gross value of the fund-covered grain purchased. Assessments shall continue until the board certifies the fund is in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

No later than April 30 of each year, the board shall meet and certify the amount in the fund. If the board certifies the fund’s current balance is more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000), then no assessment shall be levied. If, at any time after the board has certified that the balance in the fund is more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000), the board receives notification that the fund balance is less than six million dollars ($6,000,000), then the board shall reinstate the assessment within sixty (60) days. Upon notification from the board, the department shall notify each licensee and shall begin collecting the assessment within sixty (60) days.

The assessments by the board in accordance with this section are in addition to any other fees or assessments required by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 81, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 396, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 125, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 214, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 61, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2019 ch. 88, § 21, effective August 1, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Individuals who are merely purchasers and not “producers” as statutorily defined are not eligible to participate in the grain insurance program.

OAG 94-31

.

251.642.
Procedure for reentry of producer into grain insurance program after withdrawal of assessments. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 81, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 2005, ch. 125, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 61, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.650.
Use of funds — Kentucky grain insurance fund — Investment of funds — Authorization for funds to be invested through the Finance and Administration Cabinet’s Office of Financial Management — Board to report to Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and to Interim Joint Committee on Agriculture in each odd-numbered year.

The total value of assessments shall be deposited and held by the board in trust in the Kentucky grain insurance fund to pay valid claims under the provisions of this section and KRS

251.400

. These funds shall be invested and reinvested in United States Treasury obligations at the direction of the board, and the interest from these investments shall be deposited to the credit of the fund and shall be available for the same purposes as all other money deposited in the fund. The money in the fund shall not be available for any purpose other than the payment of claims in accordance with KRS

251.400

, refunds, legal fees, management fees, investment fees, and administration fees that are approved by the board. No money in this fund shall be used for any regulatory or licensing provision in this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the board may authorize the investment of funds for the Kentucky grain insurance fund through the Finance and Administration Cabinet’s Office of Financial Management in any guaranteed security or other guaranteed investment recommended by the office if the board determines the recommendation would maximize the interest or income to the fund.

By October 1 of each odd-numbered year, the board shall report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the Interim Joint Committee on Agriculture:

The current balance of the fund;

The amount of assessments, interest earned, and any other money deposited into the fund; and

The expenditures incurred due to claims, refunds, management fees, investment fees, legal fees, and administrative fees.

Each report shall reflect the deposits into and the expenditures incurred for the most recent biennium.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 396, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 147, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2009, ch. 68, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2019 ch. 88, § 22, effective August 1, 2019.

251.660.
Insufficiency of funds to pay approved claims.

In the event the amount in the Kentucky grain insurance fund is insufficient to pay approved claims, the unpaid claims shall be deemed a necessary government expense. Upon notification from the board of the amount of unpaid claims, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the State Treasurer shall make the necessary transfers from any unbudgeted balance of the general fund to pay the unpaid claims. The general fund shall be reimbursed from the assessment in accordance with KRS

251.640

, with interest at the rate paid on ninety (90) day United States Treasury bills, for any amounts transferred and paid to claimants under this section. The board shall reimburse the general fund prior to any money from the assessment being deposited into the Kentucky grain insurance fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 2009, ch. 61, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2019 ch. 88, § 23, effective August 1, 2019.

251.670.
Payment of compensation. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 396, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 61, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.675.
Conditions requiring denial of compensation from Kentucky Grain Insurance Fund. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 76, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.680.
Duty of board when dealer or warehouseman defaults or fails. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.690.
Other duties of board. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.700.
Rules and regulations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.710.
Grounds for suspension or revocation of license or cooperative agreement. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.720.
License to engage in business of buying grain from producers for resale, milling, or processing — Grounds for refusal to issue or to revoke license — Notice and hearing — Surety bond required — Invalid license — Requirements for bulk purchasers of grain. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 81, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 321, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 396, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 318, § 178, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 125, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 61, § 7, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 68, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 21, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2016 ch. 36, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.730.
Evidence required to be produced when irregularities suspected.

If irregularities are suspected, the department may issue subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of books, documents and records anywhere in the Commonwealth in any hearing affecting the authority or privilege granted by a license, or to verify the accuracy of any books or records subject to inspection under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 19, effective July 13, 1984; 2019 ch. 88, § 24, effective August 1, 2019.

251.740.
Appeal.

Any person aggrieved by a decision or ruling of the board may obtain review thereof by filing a written petition in the Circuit Court of jurisdiction as provided in KRS

13B.140

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 389, § 20, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 318, § 179, effective July 15, 1996.